District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.12

Public travel in and occupancy of restricted.

Public travel in and occupancy of said United States Capitol Grounds shall be restricted to the roads, walks, and places prepared for that purpose by flagging, paving, or otherwise.

July 31, 1946, 60 Stat. 718, ch. 707, § 2
1973 Ed., § 9-119.
1981 Ed., § 9-108.
This section is referenced in § 10-503.18 and § 10-503.22.